Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.031

Auditors and cashiers—Other assistants.

The commissioner shall have the power to appoint an auditor and cashier and such number of other assistants, as the commissioner deems necessary for the performance of the duties of the office.

[ 2003 c 334 s 306; 1927 c 255 s 15; RRS s 7797-15. Formerly RCW 79.01.060, 43.12.030.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.